Washington statutes.
RCW 25.10.471

Sharing of distributions.

A distribution by a limited partnership must be shared among the partners on the basis of the value, as stated in the required records when the limited partnership decides to make the distribution, of the contributions the limited partnership has received from each partner.

[ 2009 c 188 s 503.]